District of Columbia statutes.
44-1801

Repealed

Purpose.

Repealed.

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-99, § 2, 27 DCR 3599
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-197, § 22, 39 DCR 9195
1981 Ed., § 32-301.

Expiration of Law 9-197

Section 23(b) of D.C. Law 9-197 provided that the act shall expire 10 years from the date of its having taken effect. D.C. Law 9-197 became effective on March 16, 1993.

Severability: Section 21 of D.C. Law 9-197 provided that if any provision of the act is held invalid for any reason, the invalidity shall not effect the other provisions which shall be given effect without the invalid provisions.